New York, session 2025-2026, A8439.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3100 of the public health law is amended to read as 2 follows: 3 § 3100. Human blood and its derivatives; collection, processing, stor- 4 age and distribution; general powers of commissioner. 1. The commis- 5 sioner is hereby authorized: 6 (a) to establish, equip, maintain and conduct a suitable program to 7 collect, process, store and distribute human blood, and the various 8 human blood derivatives including special therapeutic and diagnostic 9 serums, which are deemed of value in the treatment of sick and injured 10 persons, and the prevention of certain diseases; 11 (b) to carry out such educational and research activities as [he] such 12 commissioner may deem necessary in connection with said program; [and] 13 (c) to make grants, within amounts appropriated for this purpose, to 14 not-for-profit organizations and elementary, secondary and postsecondary 15 schools to be used to help pay for the costs of conducting a local blood 16 donation drive; and 17 (d) to establish necessary rules and regulations to effect the purpose 18 of this article. 19 2. The commissioner may conduct such program solely as a state activ- 20 ity, or in cooperation with such institutions, hospitals or municipal 21 corporations as [he] such commissioner may select, on such terms as may 22 be agreed upon. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01406-01-5